ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 골프 > 골프용 훈련 장비 > 골프 퍼팅 파트너: 퍼팅 컵 및 타겟; 퍼팅 거울; 퍼팅 스트링 및 게이트 시스템
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Golf > Artykuły treningowe do golfa > Partnerzy do gry w golfa: Dołki i cele do puttingu; Lusterka do puttingu; Sznurki i bramki do puttingu
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Golf > Benodigdheden voor golftraining > Golfputtpartners: Puttingcups en -doelen; Puttingspiegels; Puttingtouw- en poortsystemen
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 高爾夫球 > 高爾夫球訓練輔助器材 > 高爾夫推桿輔助: 推桿洞杯與標靶; 推桿練習鏡; 推桿瞄準線與球門系統
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Golf > Outils d’entraînement pour le golf > Partenaires de putt de golf: Coupelles et cibles de putting; Miroirs de putting; Systèmes de cordes et de portes de putting
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Golfas > Golfo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės > Golfo kamuoliukų grąžinimo įtaisas: Ridenimo treniruočių duobutės ir taikiniai; Ridenimo treniruočių veidrodžiai; Ridenimo treniruočių virvučių ir vartelių sistemos
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Golf > Hjælpemidler til golftræning > Golfputtepartnere: Puttekopper og -mål; Puttespejle; Puttesnore og gate-systemer
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Golf > Golf-Trainingshilfen > Golf-Putting-Partner: Putt-Löcher & Ziele; Putt-Spiegel; Putt-Schnur- & Gate-Systeme
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Γκολφ > Βοηθήματα προπόνησης γκολφ > Συνεργάτες εξάσκησης χτυπήματος γκολφ: Κύπελλα και στόχοι putting; Καθρέφτες putting; Συστήματα putting με νήμα και πύλες
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Golf > Treningsutstyr for golf > Golfputtepartnere: Puttkopper og blinker; Puttespeil; Puttesnor- og portsystemer
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Golfe > Equipamentos de treino para golfe > Parceiros de prática para golfe: Buracos e alvos de putting; Espelhos de putting; Sistemas de fios e portões de putting
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Golf > Golfové tréningové pomôcky > Golfové trenažéry patovania: Jamky a terče na putting tréning; tréningové zrkadlá na putting; Systémy so šnúrkou a bránkami na tréning puttingu
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Golf > Pomagala za vježbanje golfa > Pomoćna kutija za ubačaj golf loptica: Čaše i mete za putting; Ogledala za putting; Sustavi žica i vrata za putting
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 高尔夫用品 > 高尔夫训练辅助设备 > 高尔夫推杆辅助器: 推杆练习洞杯与目标; 推杆练习镜; 推杆定位绳与球门系统
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гольф > Тренировочный инвентарь для гольфа > Машинки для возврата мячей: Лунки и мишени для паттинга; Зеркала для паттинга; Нити и ворота для паттинга
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Golf > Träningshjälpmedel för golf > Golfputtningspartner: Puttingkoppar och måltavlor; Puttingspeglar; Puttingsträngar och portsystem
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Golf > Golfin harjoitusvälineet > Golfin puttiavustajat: Puttikupit ja -kohteet; Puttipeilit; Puttinarut ja porttijärjestelmät
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กอล์ฟ > อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมกอล์ฟ > เครื่องช่วยพัตลงหลุม: หลุมพัตต์และเป้าซ้อมพัตต์; กระจกซ้อมพัตต์; ชุดเชือกและเกตซ้อมพัตต์
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Gôn > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập chơi gôn > Bộ sản phẩm tập putting: Cốc & hồng tâm tập gạt bóng; Gương tập gạt bóng; Hệ thống dây & cổng tập gạt bóng
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Golf > Golfové tréninkové pomůcky > Patování – „putting partner“: Jamky a terče na patování; Zrcadla na patování; Patovací provázky a branky
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Golf > Acessórios de treinamento de golfe > Treinadores de putt de golfe: Copos e alvos para putting; Espelhos para putting; Sistemas de cordas e portões para putting
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Golf > Golf Training Aids > Golf Putting Partners: Putting Cups & Targets; Putting Mirrors; Putting String & Gate Systems
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Golf > Pripomočki za vadbo golfa > Naprave za izboljšanje tehnike patanja: Vadbene tarče za putting; Ogledala za putting; Vadbeni sistemi za putting udarce
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Golf > Articole pentru antrenamente de golf > Parteneri pentru lovituri put pentru golf: Cupe și ținte pentru putting; Oglinzi pentru antrenament de putting; Sisteme cu fir și porți pentru aliniere putting
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Golf > Golf edzési segédeszközök > Golf-putterpartnerek: Puttoló csészék és célpontok; Puttoló tükrök; Puttoló zsinór- és kapurendszerek
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Golf > Golf Antrenman Yardımcıları > Golf Vuruş Ortakları: Vuruş delikleri ve hedefleri; Putting aynaları; Putting ip ve kapı sistemleri
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ゴルフ > ゴルフ練習器具 > ゴルフパッティングパートナー: パターカップ＆ターゲット; パッティングミラー; パッティングストリング＆ゲートシステム
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Голф > Помощни средства за обучение по голф > Уреди за връщане на топка: Дупки и цели за голф пътинг; Огледала за пътинг; Системи от въжета и врати за пътинг
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Golf > Attrezzatura allenamento golf > Partner per il putting del golf: Buche da allenamento e bersagli; Specchi per putter; Sistemi a filo e a cancello per putter
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Golf > Material de aprendizaje de golf > Compañeros de putt de golf: Copas y objetivos para putt; Espejos para putt; Sistemas de cuerdas y arcos para putt